Tennessee, session 114, SB1258.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 2-6-205, is amended by deleting the
language "no later than sixty (60) days before the election" and substituting instead "no later
than seventy-five (75) days before the election".
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
SB1258
003287
- 1 -